Florida, session 2026, HB1391.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 25.396, Florida Statutes, is created to
read:
25.396 Family court report cards pilot program.—
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1391-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1391 2026
(1)(a)1. Beginning on July 1, 2026, the Office of the
State Courts Administrator shall establish a pilot program in
three judicial circuits to implement the provisions of this
section.
2. The purpose of the pilot program is to refine data
definitions, reporting standards, publication tools, and methods
before the family court report cards are implemented statewide
pursuant to this section.
3. No later than March 1, 2027, the Office of the State
Courts Administrator shall submit to the Governor, the President
of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives a
report on the findings of the pilot program.
(b) The Legislature shall provide funding necessary for
the Office of the State Courts Administrator to implement the
pilot program, including personnel and information technology
resources dedicated to data collection, verification, and
publication.
(2)(a) Beginning July 1, 2027, and annually thereafter,
the Office of the State Courts Administrator shall prepare and
publish on its website a family court report card of each judge
who presides over family law proceedings in each judicial
circuit.
(b) The report card is intended to promote transparency,
accountability, and public confidence in the family law system
by providing standardized performance metrics regarding case
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1391-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1391 2026
management, timeliness, and outcomes.
(c) At a minimum, each report card must include all of the
following:
1. The average time to final judgment in dissolution and
time-sharing cases.
2. The percentage of cases resolved through mediation or
settlement.
3. The number and percentage of cases requiring court-
ordered psychological evaluations.
4. The average cost to parties for court-appointed
professionals, if such data is available.
5. The rate of postjudgment modifications within 3 years
after entry of final judgment.
6. The compliance rate with statutory time requirements
for rulings on motions and reports.
7. The aggregate rate of reversal on appeal in family law
cases.
(d) To ensure accurate interpretation of the metrics under
this subsection, each report card must also include all of the
following:
1. Circuit caseload volume and yearly changes.
2. Available judicial and administrative resources for
family court operations.
3. Indicators of case complexity, when quantifiable.
4. Optional narrative statements not to exceed 500 words
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1391-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1391 2026
by a presiding judge to provide context for the metrics.
(3) The Office of the State Courts Administrator shall
maintain a publicly accessible, searchable, online database of
report cards and annual statewide summaries. Such summaries must
identify trends and resource disparities across all of the
judicial circuits of this state.
(4) Report cards may not contain personal identifying
information about litigants or minor children.
(5) The Supreme Court is requested to adopt rules to
implement this section, including standardized data definitions,
reporting procedures, and quality assurance requirements.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1391-00